Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
35-1-118. Meat processing - grant and loan application assistance - definitions - legislative declaration - repeal.

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Cattle production is the largest component of Colorado's agricultural sector, and beef is Colorado's largest export;

The production and sale of feeder and live cattle by Colorado's individual producers contributes three billion seven hundred million dollars to the state's economy;

Individual producers in Colorado are dependent on the price that processors and packers are willing to pay for fed cattle;

Individual producers have not seen an equitable return for their cattle in comparison to processor and packer profits;

The United States beef processing market is highly concentrated, with the four largest beef processors controlling over eighty percent of United States beef processing, leading to large profit margins;

Small, independent meat processors can serve as an alternative to the large meat processors and introduce competition in the market;

On February 24, 2021, the United States president signed Executive Order 14017, which declares, "The United States needs resilient, diverse, and secure supply chains to ensure our economic prosperity and national security";

On February 24, 2022, the United States department of agriculture announced that the department will make two hundred fifteen million dollars available for grants and other support to expand meat processing options, strengthen the food supply chain, and create jobs and economic opportunities in rural areas;

The rural development agency in the United States department of agriculture created the meat and poultry processing expansion program, which is offering grants of up to twenty-five million dollars to expand meat and poultry processing; and

Expanding small meat processing businesses will benefit Colorado's agricultural producers, economy, and consumers.

Grant and loan application assistance.

The commissioner shall hire one employee or engage a contractor to help small meat processors and people attempting to start a small meat processor business apply for and obtain grants and loans offered by the United States department of agriculture and other entities. Each grant or loan must be used to start, expand, or support a small meat processor business.

If the employee or contractor hired or engaged by the commissioner is able, after performing the duties described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the employee or contractor may assist agricultural producers and agricultural businesses in applying for and obtaining grants from the United States department of agriculture and other entities.

As used in this section, "small meat processor" means a business that:

Employs five hundred or fewer individuals; and

Slaughters, dresses, cuts, prepares, trims, wraps, or packages an animal, meat, or meat product from an animal.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-209), ch. 429, p. 3031, § 1, effective June 8.